Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1146
Appeal; procedure.

Any affected person aggrieved by any order issued or final decision made by the department pursuant to the Nebraska Chemigation Act may appeal the order or decision, and the appeal shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act. As used in this section, affected person shall mean an applicant for a permit which is subject to an order or final decision of the department or district and any owner of an estate or interest in or concerning land whose interest is or may be impacted in a direct or significant manner by the order or final decision of the department or district.

Laws 1986, LB 284, § 46;

Laws 1988, LB 352, § 82.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.